Hawaii statutes.
§346-26 Prevention and treatment of
conditions giving rise to need. The department of human services may carry
on or administer or cooperate with other public or private agencies in work or
activities for the purpose of preventing or treating conditions giving rise to
the need for public assistance in any case in which such work or activities may
prevent, shorten, or eliminate the need of public assistance. Such work or
activities, if any, shall be taken into consideration in deciding upon or
deferring action upon any application for public assistance. [L 1941, c 296, pt
of §1; RL 1945, §4831; RL 1955, §108-12; HRS §346-26; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am
L 1987, c 339, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next